Missouri, session 2026, HB2777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.1650, to read as follows:
537.1650. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Public
Nuisance Reform Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Governmental entity", an officer, agency, or instrumentality of this state or
a political subdivision of the state;
(2) "Illegal product", a product that is possessed by a party alleged to be
creating a public nuisance and the party's possession of such product is specifically
prohibited by a federal or state statute including, but not limited to, laws regarding
controlled substances.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law, the following nonexclusive list of
actions or conditions shall not be considered a public nuisance or otherwise form the
basis for a public nuisance cause of action under the laws of this state:
(1) The design, manufacturing, distributing, selling, labeling, or marketing of a
product sold in commerce except an illegal product;
(2) An action or condition that is authorized, approved, licensed, or mandated by
statute, ordinance, regulation, permit, license, order, rule, or other similar measure
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2777 2
issued, adopted, promulgated, or approved by a governmental entity or the federal
government;
(3) The aggregation of individual injuries or private rights, including private
nuisances; or
(4) Any other claim, action, or condition determined by common law not to
constitute or give rise to a cause of action for public nuisance.
4. (1) In addition to all other requirements, the plaintiff in a public nuisance
claim shall plead with particularity and prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
each named defendant's actions were both a but-for and proximate cause of the alleged
public nuisance.
(2) For purposes of the requirements under subdivision (1) of this subsection, a
but-for cause means that but for the defendant's actions:
(a) The alleged public nuisance would not exist in the plaintiff's jurisdiction; or
(b) The plaintiff's expenditures to abate or address the nuisance would decrease
by more than twenty-five percent.
(3) For purposes of the requirements under subdivision (1) of this subsection, a
defendant is a proximate cause of a public nuisance only if:
(a) The defendant engaged in the activity that directly caused the public
nuisance and the public nuisance was a reasonably foreseeable result of defendant's
conduct; or
(b) The defendant controlled or instructed one or more third persons to engage
in the activity or activities that directly caused the public nuisance and the resulting
public nuisance was a reasonably foreseeable result of that third-party activity.
5. (1) A public nuisance cause of action may be brought by, on the relation of, or
in the name of a political subdivision of this state, or any body or officer thereof, only if
the alleged public nuisance is wholly contained within the jurisdiction of that political
subdivision.
(2) In all circumstances other than provided under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, no government agency or officer other than the attorney general may bring
a public nuisance claim under the laws of this state. Prior to asserting any claim for
public nuisance, the attorney general shall confer with and receive the approval of the
governor. Such approval shall be in writing.
(3) A public nuisance cause of action by a political subdivision or the attorney
general shall be brought only by a verified complaint, counterclaim, or third-party
complaint that pleads each element with particularity as required by applicable rules of
civil procedure.

HB 2777 3
(4) In a public nuisance action brought under this subsection, a court shall not
award either of the following:
(a) Damages of any kind, including economic, noneconomic, and exemplary
damages; or
(b) The costs of abating a potential future public nuisance.
6. (1) A public nuisance claim may be brought by a private person only if that
person has sustained a special injury proximately caused by the defendant's conduct
and only if the person proves, by clear and convincing evidence, the existence of the
special injury caused by the defendant. A public nuisance claim by a private person
shall be brought by a verified complaint, counterclaim, or third-party claim that pleads
each element with particularity as required by applicable rules of civil procedure.
(2) A special injury under this subsection is an injury that is different in kind,
not just in degree, from an injury sustained by the general public exercising the same
public right. A special injury shall not be based upon impairment of the spiritual,
cultural, or emotional significance associated with a navigable lake, river, bay, stream,
canal, or basin or a public park, square, street, road, or highway.
(3) Financial expenditures made by a private person related to an injunction of,
or any other response to, a public nuisance does not constitute a special injury sufficient
to confer standing on the person to file or maintain a public nuisance action.
(4) The remedy available to a private person in a public nuisance action is
limited solely to compensatory damages for the special injury that are not otherwise
reimbursed by a governmental entity or the federal government.
(5) The abatement of a public nuisance by the defendant does not preclude the
right of a person to recover compensatory damages under this subsection.
(6) A private person shall not bring a class action for a public nuisance.
7. (1) No claim for public nuisance shall be brought against a defendant more
than three years after the plaintiff knew or should have known of the conduct of the
defendant that caused the public nuisance.
(2) No claim for public nuisance shall recover any damages or other monetary
relief for a defendant's conduct occurring more than ten years before the date on which
the complaint was filed.
8. It is the intent of the general assembly that this section abrogates the common
law of public nuisance in this state to the extent the common law is inconsistent with this
section.

HB 2777 4
9. The provisions of this section shall apply to public nuisance claims brought on
or after August 28, 2026. Nothing in this section extends or reopens the statute of
limitations for any claim arising before August 28, 2026.
✔